Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.139

Recount.

"Recount" means the process of retabulating ballots and producing amended election returns based on that retabulation, even if the vote totals have not changed.

[ 2003 c 111 s 124. Prior: 2001 c 225 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.01.136.]